Maryland, session 2026, HB0675.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “County” means a county of the State or Baltimore City.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0675*

HOUSE BILL 675
3–535.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT AGREEMENT” MEANS AN
AGREEMENT OR A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING WITH THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH 8 U.S.C. § 1357 THAT AUTHORIZES A
LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY IN THE STATE TO ENFORCE CIVIL IMMIGRATION
LAW USING THE JAIL ENFORCEMENT MODEL.
(3) “LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY” MEANS THE POLICE
DEPARTMENT, BUREAU, OR FORCE OF A COUNTY.
(4) “OFFICE” MEANS THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF CRIME
PREVENTION AND POLICY.
(B) THE OFFICE SHALL BE RESPONSIBLE FOR ENFORCING THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, EACH LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THAT
OPERATES A CORRECTIONAL FACILITY SHALL ENTER INTO AN IMMIGRATION
ENFORCEMENT AGREEMENT.
(2) (I) A LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY MAY APPLY FOR A
ONE–TIME WAIVER FROM THE OFFICE IN ORDER TO DELAY THE DATE BY WHICH THE
LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY MUST ENTER INTO AN IMMIGRATION
ENFORCEMENT AGREEMENT.
(II) THE OFFICE MAY GRANT A ONE–TIME WAIVER TO A LOCAL
LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY TO DELAY THE DATE BY WHICH THE LOCAL LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY MUST ENTER INTO AN IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT
AGREEMENT.
(III) A LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THAT OBTAINS A
WAIVER UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL ENTER INTO AN IMMIGRATION
ENFORCEMENT AGREEMENT ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027.
(D) (1) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, A LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY
THAT OPERATES A CORRECTIONAL FACILITY THAT HAS NOT MET THE
REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION SHALL, IF REQUESTED BY

HOUSE BILL 675 3
FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES:
(I) DETAIN AN INDIVIDUAL FOR UP TO 48 HOURS IN ORDER TO
FACILITATE THE TRANSFER OF THE INDIVIDUAL TO FEDERAL IMMIGRATION
AUTHORITIES; AND
(II) TRANSFER AN INDIVIDUAL TO FEDERAL IMMIGRATION
AUTHORITIES.
(2) IF A LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THAT OPERATES A
CORRECTIONAL FACILITY VIOLATES THIS SUBSECTION BY RELEASING AN
INDIVIDUAL AND THE INDIVIDUAL IS LATER DETAINED OR ARRESTED BY ANOTHER
LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OF THE STATE, ANOTHER STATE, OR THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT WITHIN 5 YEARS OF BEING RELEASED BY THE LOCAL LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, THE LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THAT RELEASED
THE INDIVIDUAL IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE RESPONSIBLE FOR:
(I) ANY HOUSING COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH DETAINING THE
INDIVIDUAL; AND
(II) ANY COURT COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH ANY CRIMINAL
PROCEEDING INVOLVING THE INDIVIDUAL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.